Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-139.01
National Guard; peace officer;
powers.

While
in the active service of the state or on orders under 32 U.S.C., as a member
of the militia of this state or another state, by direction or request of
the Governor, members of the National Guard are peace officers and conservators
of the peace with the power to keep the same, to prevent crime, to arrest
any person liable thereto, or to execute process of law. They may call any
person to their aid and, when necessary, may summon the power of the state.
The authority to perform peace officer duties will be established within the
official order to duty and may be limited by the Governor, in writing, as
necessitated by the mission.

Laws 2010, LB550, § 7.